Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 4 Fair Housing
8-3-213.
State action for enforcement; fines; damages; civil action by local agency; administrative proceeding.

When a charge is issued to initiate an administrative complaint under Code Section 8-3-211, a complainant, a respondent, or an aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint was filed may elect to have the claims asserted in that charge decided in a civil action brought by the Attorney General on behalf of the aggrieved person as provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection in lieu of a hearing under subsection (e) of this Code section. The election must be made not later than 20 days after the receipt by the electing person of service under Code Section 8-3-211 or, in the case of the administrator, not later than 20 days after such service. The person making such election shall give notice of doing so to the administrator and to all other complainants and respondents to whom the charge relates.

If the administrator has been unable to obtain voluntary compliance or as a result of an investigation under Code Section 8-3-209 finds that there is reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred, at the recommendation of the administrator, the Attorney General shall bring an action in the name of the state on behalf of the aggrieved person to enforce the provisions of this article.

If an election is made under this subsection, the administrator shall authorize and, not later than 30 days after the election is made, the Attorney General shall commence a civil action in the name of the state on behalf of the aggrieved person seeking relief under this Code section in a superior court.

Whenever an action filed in court pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section or Code Section 8-3-217 or 8-3-218 comes to trial, the administrator shall immediately terminate all efforts to obtain voluntary compliance.

The court may impose the following fines if the respondent has been adjudged to have committed a discriminatory housing practice:

Up to $10,000.00, if the respondent has not previously been found guilty of committing a discriminatory housing practice;

Up to $25,000.00, if the respondent has been found guilty of committing one prior discriminatory housing practice within the preceding five years; or

Up to $50,000.00, if the respondent has been found guilty of committing two or more discriminatory housing practices within the preceding seven years.

The court in its discretion may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs; provided, however, that a respondent may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs only if the respondent prevails on all alleged violations of this article and upon a showing that the action is frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

In addition to the remedies set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the court may award actual damages and punitive damages to the aggrieved person. Punitive damages awarded under this subsection may be awarded only when the evidence shows that the respondent’s actions showed willful misconduct, malice, fraud, wantonness, oppression, or that entire want of care which would raise the presumption of conscious indifference to consequences or to the rights of the aggrieved party.

Any local agency certified as substantially equivalent by the secretary of housing and urban development pursuant to Section 810 of the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 may institute a civil action in any appropriate court, including superior court, if it is unable to obtain voluntary compliance with the local fair housing law. The agency need not have petitioned for an administrative hearing or exhausted its administrative remedies prior to bringing a civil action. The court may impose fines as provided in the local fair housing law.

Where an election is not made under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the administrator shall refer the complaint to an administrative law judge of the Office of State Administrative Hearings. An administrative hearing shall be conducted as provided for under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Not more than seven working days after the case has been referred to the administrative law judge, the administrator shall serve on the respondent and the person aggrieved or the aggrieved person’s attorney by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery a written notice together with a copy of the complaint requiring the respondent to answer the charges contained therein at a hearing before the administrative law judge at a time and place specified in the notice. Such notice must contain all general and specific charges against the respondent.

The respondent shall serve an answer with the administrative law judge by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery not more than 20 working days after receipt of the notice of hearing, which 20 working days may be extended by the administrative law judge in the administrative law judge’s discretion for an additional time not to exceed ten working days. The respondent’s answer must show by a certificate of service that the respondent has served a copy of the answer on the administrator and complainant or the complainant’s attorney at the last known address of the complainant or the complainant’s attorney where the complainant is represented by an attorney. Upon leave of the administrative law judge, the complainant may amend the charges contained in the notice of hearing. The respondent may amend an answer at any time prior to the hearing or, upon leave of the administrative law judge, may amend thereafter. No order shall be issued unless the respondent has had the opportunity of a hearing on the charges contained in the notice of hearing or amendment on which the final order is based. If the respondent fails to answer the complaint, the administrative law judge may enter the respondent’s default. Unless the default is set aside for good cause shown, the hearing may proceed under the available evidence.

A respondent who has filed an answer or whose default in answering has been set aside for good cause shown may appear at the hearing, may examine and cross-examine witnesses and the complainant, and may offer evidence. The complainant and, at the discretion of the administrative law judge, any other person may intervene, examine and cross-examine witnesses, and present evidence.

Efforts at conference, conciliation, and persuasion shall not be received in evidence.

Testimony taken at the hearing shall be under oath and shall be stenographically or otherwise recorded by a certified court reporter. After the hearing, the administrative law judge at the administrative law judge’s discretion may take further evidence or hear arguments upon notice to all parties with an opportunity to be present.

Except as otherwise specifically provided for in this article, all proceedings of the administrative law judge shall be conducted as provided for with respect to contested cases in Chapter 13 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-213

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 7; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 4/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in paragraph (a)(1), in the first sentence, substituted “issued” for “filed” and “Code Section 8-3-211” for “Code Section 8-3-208” near the beginning, and substituted “subsection (e)” for “subparagraph (e)(1)(A) or (e)(1)(B)” near the end; deleted “, after reviewing the administrator’s findings and determining that such findings are well grounded in fact and warranted by law,” following “the Attorney General” in paragraph (a)(2); in paragraph (a)(3), deleted “paragraph (1) or (2) of” following “is made under”, deleted “, after reviewing the administrator’s charge and determining that such charge is well grounded in fact and warranted by law,” following “Attorney General” near the middle, and inserted “in the name of the state” near the end; in paragraph (c)(2), substituted “in its discretion may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs; provided, however, that a respondent may be awarded” for “may award” near the beginning, substituted “court costs only if” for “costs to the administrator or aggrieved person in any action in which the administrator or aggrieved person prevails or to the respondent in any action in which” in the middle, and substituted “on all alleged violations of this article and” for “only” near the end; and rewrote subsection (e).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “secretary of housing and urban development” was substituted for “Secretary of Housing and Urban Development” in subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

8-3-214.
Orders of administrative law judge.

If the administrative law judge determines that the respondent has not engaged in a discriminatory housing practice, the administrative law judge shall state the administrative law judge’s findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order within 30 days after the hearing unless, for good cause shown, such time is extended by the administrative law judge, dismissing the complaint.

If the administrative law judge determines that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory housing practice, the administrative law judge shall state the administrative law judge’s findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue an order within 30 days after the hearing unless, for good cause shown, such time is extended by the administrative law judge, granting such relief as may be appropriate, which may include actual compensatory damages suffered by the aggrieved person and injunctive or other equitable relief. The prevailing party may, in the discretion of the administrative law judge, be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; provided, however, that a respondent may only be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs against a party if the respondent prevails on all alleged violations of this article and upon a showing that the proceeding is frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

No order of the administrative law judge or final order of the administrator shall affect any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of such order and involving a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant without actual notice of the charge filed under this article. In the case of an order with respect to a discriminatory housing practice that occurred in the course of a business subject to licensing or regulation by a governmental agency, the administrator shall, not later than 30 days after the date the order becomes final, or, if such order is judicially reviewed, 30 days after such order is in substance affirmed upon review, send copies of the findings of fact, conclusions of law, and the order to that governmental agency and recommend to that governmental agency appropriate disciplinary action. In the case of an order against a respondent against whom another order was issued within the preceding five years under this Code section, the administrator shall send a copy of each such order to the Attorney General.

If the administrative law judge finds that the respondent has not engaged or is not about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice, as the case may be, the administrative law judge shall enter an order dismissing the charge. The administrator shall make public disclosure of each such dismissal when it becomes final.

The administrator may review and reject or modify any finding, conclusion, or order issued by the administrative law judge. In the absence of an appeal by any of the parties to the administrator or any action taken by the administrator within 30 days after the finding, conclusion, or order is so issued, such finding, conclusion, or order shall become the final order of the Commission on Equal Opportunity.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-214

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 8; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 5/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, rewrote this Code section, which read: “(a) If the board of commissioners determines that the respondent has not engaged in a discriminatory housing practice, the board of commissioners shall state the board of commissioners’ findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order within 30 days after the hearing unless, for good cause shown, such time is extended by the board of commissioners, dismissing the complaint.

“(b) If the board of commissioners determines that the respondent has engaged in a discriminatory housing practice, the board of commissioners shall state the board of commissioners’ findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order within 30 days after the hearing unless, for good cause shown, such time is extended by the board of commissioners, granting such relief as may be appropriate, which may include actual compensatory damages suffered by the aggrieved person and injunctive or other equitable relief and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. A prevailing respondent may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs only upon a showing that the proceeding is frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation. Attorney’s fees may be awarded against a complainant or an aggrieved party if such party joined in the proceeding on its own as an intervening party.

“(c) No order of the board of commissioners shall affect any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of such order and involving a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant without actual notice of the charge filed under this article. In the case of an order with respect to a discriminatory housing practice that occurred in the course of a business subject to licensing or regulation by a governmental agency, the administrator shall, not later than 30 days after the date of the issuance of such order, or, if such order is judicially reviewed, 30 days after such order is in substance affirmed upon review, send copies of the findings of fact, conclusions of law, and the order to that governmental agency and recommend to that governmental agency appropriate disciplinary action. In the case of an order against a respondent against whom another order was issued within the preceding five years under this Code section, the administrator shall send a copy of each such order to the Attorney General.

“(d) If the board of commissioners finds that the respondent has not engaged or is not about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice, as the case may be, the board of commissioners shall enter an order dismissing the charge. The administrator shall make public disclosure of each such dismissal.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “attorney’s” was substituted for “attorney” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in both subsections (a) and (b), “commissioners’ ” was substituted for “commissioner’s” and a comma was deleted following “order”, and “a” was deleted preceding “licensing” in the second sentence of subsection (c).

8-3-215.
Appeal from order of administrative law judge; attorney’s fees and costs.

Any party to a hearing before the administrative law judge may appeal any adverse final order of the administrative law judge by filing a petition for review in the Superior Court of Fulton County within 30 days of the issuance of the final order. The administrative law judge shall not be a named party. The administrator must be served with a copy of the petition for review. Within 30 days after the petition is served on the administrator, the administrator shall forward to the court a certified copy of the record of the hearing before the administrative law judge, including the transcript of the hearing before the administrative law judge and all evidence, administrative pleadings, and orders, or the entire record if no hearing has been held. For good cause shown, the court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record. All appeals for judicial review shall be in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; provided, however, that if any provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50 conflict with any provision of this article, this article controls.

The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the administrative law judge as to the weight of the evidence on questions of fact. The court may affirm a final order of the administrative law judge or remand the case for further proceedings. The court may reverse or modify the final order if substantial rights of the appellant have been prejudiced because the administrative findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions are:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provisions;

In excess of the statutory authority of the agency;

Made upon unlawful procedures;

Affected by other error of law;

Clearly erroneous in view of the reliable, probative, and substantial evidence on the whole record; or

Arbitrary, capricious, or characterized by abuse of discretion or clearly unwarranted exercise of discretion.

Upon judicial review of any order of the administrator or in a proceeding in which a complainant seeks enforcement of a conciliation agreement, the court in its discretion may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; provided, however, that a respondent may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs only if the respondent prevails on all alleged violations in the order or of the conciliation agreement and upon a showing that the action is frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-215

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 9; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 6/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “administrative law judge,” for “board of commissioners” in subsections (a) and (b); substituted “Superior Court of Fulton County” for “superior court in the county in which the alleged unlawful practice occurred or in the superior court of the residence of the respondent” near the end of the first sentence of subsection (a); rewrote paragraph (b)(5), which read: “Not supported by substantial evidence, which shall mean that the record does not contain such relevant evidence as a reasonable mind might accept as adequate to support said findings, inferences, conclusions, or decisions; or”; and rewrote subsection (c), which read: “If, upon judicial review of any order of the board of commissioners or in a proceeding in which a complainant seeks enforcement of a conciliation agreement, the court rules in favor of the complainant, then the court may in its discretion render an award of reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of litigation in the superior court to the complainant. A prevailing respondent may be awarded court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees only upon a showing that the action is frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.”

8-3-216.
Filing order of administrator in superior court and judgment thereon.

Any person affected by a final order of the administrator may file in the superior court of the county of the residence of the respondent a certified copy of a final order of the administrator unappealed from or of a final order of the administrator affirmed upon appeal, whereupon said court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-216

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 7/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the first sentence, deleted “or the board of commissioners” following “administrator” near the beginning, deleted “or of the board of commissioners” preceding “unappealed from” near the middle, and substituted “administrator” for “board of commissioners”.

8-3-217.
Civil actions by aggrieved persons.

An aggrieved person may commence a civil action in an appropriate superior court not later than two years after the occurrence or the termination of an alleged discriminatory housing practice or the breach of a conciliation agreement entered into under this article, whichever occurs last, to obtain appropriate relief with respect to such discriminatory housing practice or breach of a conciliation agreement.

The computation of such two-year period shall not include any time during which an administrative proceeding under this article was pending with respect to a complaint or charge under this article based upon such discriminatory housing practice. This paragraph does not apply to actions arising from a breach of a conciliation agreement.

An aggrieved person may commence a civil action under this subsection whether or not a complaint has been filed under Code Section 8-3-208 and without regard to the status of any such complaint, but if the administrator has obtained a conciliation agreement with the consent of an aggrieved person, no action may be filed under this subsection by such aggrieved person with respect to the alleged discriminatory housing practice which forms the basis for such complaint except for the purpose of enforcing the terms of such conciliation agreement.

An aggrieved person may not commence a civil action under this subsection with respect to an alleged discriminatory housing practice which forms the basis of a charge issued by the administrator if an administrative law judge has commenced a hearing on the record under this article with respect to such charge.

The court may grant as relief, as it deems appropriate, any permanent or temporary injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order and may award to the plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees, court costs, actual damages, and punitive damages. Punitive damages may be awarded under this article only when the evidence shows that the respondent’s actions showed willful misconduct, malice, fraud, wantonness, oppression, or that entire want of care which would raise the presumption of conscious indifference to consequences or to the rights of the aggrieved party.

Where it is proved that the aggrieved party took an active part in the initiation, continuation, or procurement of civil proceedings against a respondent, the aggrieved party may be liable for abusive litigation as provided for in Article 5 of Chapter 7 of Title 51.

Relief granted under this Code section shall not affect any contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the granting of such relief and involving a bona fide purchaser, lessee, or tenant without actual notice of a complaint filed with the administrator or civil action under this Code section.

Upon timely application, the Attorney General may intervene in such civil action if the Attorney General certifies that the case is of general public importance. Upon such intervention, the Attorney General may obtain such relief as would be available to the Attorney General under Code Section 8-3-218 in a civil action to which such Code section applies.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-217

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 11; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 8/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “an administrative law judge” for “the board of commissioners” near the end of paragraph (a)(4); and deleted “not to exceed penalties permitted by the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Section 3601, et seq., as amended” following “punitive damages” at the end of the first sentence in paragraph (b)(1).

8-3-218.
Civil actions by Attorney General.

Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that any person or group of persons is engaged in a pattern or practice of resistance to the full enjoyment of any of the rights granted by this article or that any group of persons has been denied any of the rights granted by this article and such denial raises an issue of general public importance, the Attorney General may commence a civil action in any appropriate superior court.

The Attorney General may commence a civil action in any appropriate superior court for appropriate relief with respect to a discriminatory housing practice referred to the Attorney General by the administrator under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 8-3-211. A civil action brought under this paragraph may be commenced not later than 180 days from the date a reasonable cause determination is issued by the administrator.

The Attorney General may commence a civil action in any appropriate superior court for appropriate relief with respect to breach of a conciliation agreement referred to the Attorney General by the administrator under subsection (d) of Code Section 8-3-209. A civil action brought under this paragraph may be commenced not later than the expiration of 90 days after the referral of the alleged breach under subsection (d) of Code Section 8-3-209.

The Attorney General, on behalf of the administrator or other party at whose request a subpoena is issued under this article, may enforce such subpoena in appropriate proceedings in the superior court for the county in which the person to whom the subpoena was addressed resides, was served, or transacts business.

In a civil action brought under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, the court:

May award such preventive relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against the persons responsible for a violation of this article as is necessary to assure the full enjoyment of the rights granted by this article;

May award such other relief as the court deems appropriate, including actual damages to persons aggrieved; and

May, to vindicate the public interest, assess a civil penalty against the respondent:

In an amount not exceeding $50,000.00 for a first violation; or

In an amount not exceeding $100,000.00 for any subsequent violation.

In a civil action brought under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, the court in its discretion may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs; provided, however, that a respondent may be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs if the respondent prevails on all alleged violations of this article and upon a showing that the action is frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

Upon timely application, any person may intervene in a civil action commenced by the Attorney General under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section which involves an alleged discriminatory housing practice with respect to which such person is an aggrieved person or a conciliation agreement to which such person is a party. The court may grant such appropriate relief to any such intervening party as is authorized to be granted to a plaintiff in a civil action under Code Section 8-3-217.

Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to limit or alter the Attorney General’s authority to determine whether to file or otherwise maintain a civil action.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-218

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 9/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in paragraph (d)(2), inserted “court” and substituted “court costs if the respondent prevails on all alleged violations of this article and” for “court costs only” near the end; and added subsection (f).

8-3-219.
Expediting of actions under Code Section 8-3-217 or 8-3-218.

Any court in which a proceeding is instituted under Code Section 8-3-217 or 8-3-218 shall assign the case for hearing at the earliest practicable date and cause the case to be expedited.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-219

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-220.
Adoption of provisions in local ordinance.

A political subdivision of this state may adopt verbatim the laws against discriminatory housing practices cited in Code Section 8-3-202, 8-3-203, 8-3-204, 8-3-205, or 8-3-222 of this article as a local ordinance but may not expand or reduce the rights granted by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-220

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-221.
Cooperation with federal and local agencies.

The administrator may cooperate with federal and local agencies charged with the administration of federal and local fair housing laws or ordinances and, with the consent of such agencies, utilize the services of such agencies and their employees.
In furtherance of such cooperative efforts, the administrator may enter into written agreements with such federal or local agencies.
All agreements and terminations thereof shall be published in the Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-221

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-222.
Coercion, intimidation, threats, or interference.

It shall be unlawful to coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of such person’s having exercised or enjoyed, or on account of such person’s having aided or encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, any right granted or protected by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-222

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-223.
Compliance with federal law.

Compliance with the provisions of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (Pub. L. No. 100-430) shall be deemed compliance with the provisions of paragraph (7) of Code Section 8-3-201 and subparagraph (a)(7)(B) of Code Section 8-3-202. In addition, should any provision of this article relating to the treatment of persons with disabilities be in conflict with any provision of the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, then the provisions of the latter shall prevail.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-223

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 3.